Alabama, session 2026rs, HB123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Cook Museum of Natural Science and
the McWane Science Center are exempt from paying any state
sales and use taxes.
(b) Any county or municipality may exempt the Cook
Museum of Natural Science or the McWane Science Center from
the payment of county or municipal sales and use taxes in
accordance with Section 40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB123 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Ways and Means
Education

Read for the second time and placed ................29-Jan-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................03-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 105
Nays 0
Abstains 0


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 2